California statutes. Labor Code
 agreement is signed. An installment payment agreement shall be included within the settlement agreement and charge interest on the outstanding amounts due for unpaid taxes at the adjusted annual rate and by the method established pursuant to Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and due for unpaid wages at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code. Interest on amounts due shall be charged from the day after the date the settlement
 agreement is executed, which will be the new date of delinquency, until paid. The settlement agreement shall contain a provision that if a construction contractor fails, without good cause, to fully comply with terms of the settlement agreement authorizing installment payments, the settlement agreement shall be null and void and the total amount of tax, interest, and penalties for the time period covered by the settlement agreement shall be immediately due and payable.

(i) The Labor Commissioner and the department may share any information necessary to carry out the program. Sharing information pursuant to this subdivision shall not constitute a waiver of any
 applicable confidentiality requirements and the party
 receiving the information shall be subject to any existing confidentiality requirements for that information.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding any other law and pursuant to the program, an eligible construction contractor that executed and performed its obligations pursuant to a settlement agreement shall not be liable, and the Labor Commissioner or the department shall not enforce, any civil or statutory penalties under this code or the Unemployment Insurance Code resulting from the misclassification of employees, including, but not limited to, remedies available under subdivision (e) of Section 226, that might have become due and payable for the time period covered by the settlement agreement, except for the following penalties:

(A) A penalty
 assessed by the department under Section 1128 of the Unemployment Insurance Code that is final on the date of the settlement agreement is executed, unless the penalty is reversed by the California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board.

(B) A penalty for an amount an eligible construction contractor admitted was based on fraud or made with the intent to evade the reporting requirements set forth in this division, Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or authorized regulations.

(C) A penalty based on a violation of this division or Division 6
 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code and either of the following:

(i) The eligible construction contractor was on notice of a criminal investigation due to a complaint having been filed or by written notice having been mailed to the eligible construction contractor informing the construction contractor that they are under criminal investigation.

(ii) A criminal court proceeding has already been initiated against the eligible construction contractor.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law and pursuant to the program, an eligible construction contractor that executed and performed their obligations pursuant to a settlement agreement shall not be liable, and the Labor Commissioner or the department shall
 not enforce, any unpaid penalties or interest owed on unpaid penalties for which an eligible construction contractor may have been liable but that were not yet assessed by the department or by a court of competent jurisdiction on or before the date the settlement agreement was executed, pursuant to Sections 1112, 1112.5, 1126, and 1127 of the Unemployment Insurance Code for the tax reporting periods for which the settlement agreement is applicable, that may be owed as a result of the nonpayment of tax liabilities due to the misclassification of one or more construction drivers as independent contractors and the reclassification of these construction drivers as employees. Any penalties, and interest owed on penalties, established as a result of an assessment issued by the department or by a court of competent
 jurisdiction before the date the settlement agreement was executed shall not be waived pursuant to the program.

(B) For purposes of paragraph (1), state personal income taxes required to be withheld by Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and owed by the construction contractor pursuant to Section 13070 of the Unemployment Insurance Code shall not be collected, if the eligible construction contractor issued an information return pursuant to Section 6041A of the Internal
 Revenue Code reporting payment or if the construction driver certifies that the state personal income tax has been paid or that the construction driver has reported to the Franchise Tax Board the payment against which the state personal income tax would have been imposed.

(3) A refund or credit for any penalty or interest paid prior to the date an eligible construction contractor applied to participate in the program shall not be granted.

(4) Except for violations described in Section 2119 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, the department shall not bring a criminal action for failing to report tax liabilities against an eligible construction contractor that executed and
 performed their obligations pursuant to a settlement agreement for the tax reporting periods subject to the settlement agreement.

(k) The statute of limitations on any claim or liability that might have been asserted against a construction contractor based on the construction contractor having misclassified a construction driver as an independent contractor shall be tolled from the date a construction contractor applies for participation in the program through the date the Labor Commissioner either denies the construction contractor participation in the program or the construction contractor, as an eligible construction contractor, has failed to perform an obligation under the settlement agreement, whichever is later.

(l) (1) The recovery obtained by the
 Labor Commissioner on behalf of a reclassified construction driver pursuant to a settlement agreement shall be tendered to the construction driver on the condition that the construction driver shall execute a release of all claims covered by the settlement agreement that the construction driver may have against the eligible construction contractor based on the eligible construction contractor’s failure to classify the construction driver as an employee.

(2) A construction driver shall not be under any obligation to accept the terms of a settlement agreement.

(A) If a construction driver declines to accept the terms of a settlement agreement, the construction driver shall not be bound by the settlement agreement, except that the eligible construction contractor shall still
 reclassify the construction driver as an employee and that construction driver shall be precluded from pursuing a claim for civil penalties or statutory penalties under the Labor Code Private Attorneys General Act of 2004 (Part 13 (commencing with Section 2698) of Division 2) for a claim arising during the period of time covered by the settlement agreement.

(B) If a construction driver does not accept the terms of a settlement agreement, the construction contractor shall be excused from performing their requirement under the settlement agreement to pay the amount acknowledged in the settlement agreement to be due to that construction driver.

(m) (1) If the Labor Commissioner determines an eligible construction contractor violated or failed to perform any of their obligations
 under a settlement agreement, the Labor Commissioner may file a civil action to enforce the settlement agreement.

(2) (A) If the Labor Commissioner files a civil action seeking only recovery of the amounts due to construction drivers under the settlement agreement, the Labor Commissioner may obtain judicial enforcement by filing a petition for entry of judgment for the liabilities due and remaining pursuant to the settlement agreement.

(B) After filing a petition pursuant to subparagraph (A), the Labor Commissioner may file an application for an order to show cause and serve it on the eligible construction contractor. Within 60 days of the date the Labor Commissioner filed the order to show cause, the court shall hold a hearing and enter a judgment. The judgment shall be in
 amounts which are due and owing to construction drivers pursuant to the settlement agreement with credits, if any, for applicable payments the eligible construction contractor made under the settlement agreement. A judgment entered pursuant to this paragraph shall not preclude subsequent action to recover civil penalties or statutory penalties by the Labor Commissioner, or by an employee pursuant to Sections 2698 to 2699.5, inclusive.

(3) If the court determines in any action filed by the Labor Commissioner that a construction contractor has violated or otherwise failed to perform any of their obligations under a settlement agreement, the court shall award the Labor Commissioner costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 659, Sec. 1.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2751.

(a) Whenever an employer enters into a contract of employment with an employee for services to be rendered within this state and the contemplated method of payment of the employee involves commissions, the contract shall be in writing and shall set forth the method by which the commissions shall be computed and paid.

(b) The employer shall give a signed copy of the contract to every employee who is a party thereto and shall obtain a signed receipt for the contract from each employee. In the case of a contract that expires and where the parties nevertheless continue to work under the terms of the expired contract, the contract terms are presumed to remain in full force and effect until the contract is superseded or employment
 is terminated by either party.

(c) As used in this section, “commissions” has the meaning set forth in Section 204.1. For purposes of this section only, “commission” does not include any of the following:

(1) Short-term productivity bonuses such as are paid to retail clerks.

(2) Temporary, variable incentive payments that increase, but do not decrease, payment under the written contract.

(3) Bonus and profit-sharing plans, unless there has been an offer by the employer to pay a fixed percentage of sales or profits as compensation for work to be performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 826, Sec. 1.   (AB 2675)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2753.

(a) A person who, for money or other valuable consideration, knowingly advises an employer to treat an individual as an independent contractor to avoid employee status for that individual shall be jointly and severally liable with the employer if the individual is found not to be an independent contractor.

(b) This section does not apply to the following persons:

(1) A person who provides advice to his or her employer.

(2) An attorney authorized to practice law in California or another United States jurisdiction who provides legal advice in the course of the practice of
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   (SB 459)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2754.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “California-based team” means a team that plays a majority of its home games in California.

(2) “Cheerleader” means an individual who performs acrobatics, dance, or gymnastics exercises on a recurring basis. This term shall not include an individual who is not otherwise affiliated with a California-based professional sports team and is utilized during its exhibitions, events, or games no more than one time in a calendar year.

(3) “Professional sports team” means a team at either a minor or major
 league level in the sport of baseball, basketball, football, ice hockey, or soccer.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of all of the provisions of state law that govern employment, including this code, the Unemployment Insurance Code, and the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), a cheerleader who is utilized by a California-based professional sports team directly or through a labor contractor during its exhibitions, events, or games, shall be deemed to be an employee.

(c) The professional sports team shall ensure that the cheerleader is classified as an employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 102, Sec. 1.   (AB 202)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2755.

(a) For purposes of implementing Section 12316.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the state, counties, and public authorities are not the employer or joint employer of any In-Home Supportive Services provider, except as explicitly set forth under state law.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent allowable under state and federal law, the Career Pathways Program shall be a separate and voluntary benefit and shall not produce an adverse effect to recipients or providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 696, Sec. 17.   (AB 172)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Worker Status: Employees [2775. - 2787.]

2775.

(a) As used in this article:

(1) “Dynamex” means Dynamex Operations W. Inc. v. Superior Court (2018) 4 Cal.5th 903.

(2) “Borello” means the California Supreme Court’s decision in S. G. Borello & Sons, Inc. v. Department of Industrial Relations (1989) 48 Cal.3d 341.

(b) (1) For purposes of this code and the Unemployment Insurance Code, and for the purposes of wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, a person providing labor or services for remuneration shall be considered an employee rather than an independent contractor unless the hiring entity demonstrates that all of the following
 conditions are satisfied:

(A) The person is free from the control and direction of the hiring entity in connection with the performance of the work, both under the contract for the performance of the work and in fact.

(B) The person performs work that is outside the usual course of the hiring entity’s business.

(C) The person is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, or business of the same nature as that involved in the work performed.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any exceptions to the terms “employee,” “employer,” “employ,” or “independent contractor,” and any extensions of employer status or liability, that are expressly made by a provision of this code, the Unemployment Insurance Code, or in an applicable order
 of the Industrial Welfare Commission, including, but not limited to, the definition of “employee” in subdivision 2(E) of Wage Order No. 2, shall remain in effect for the purposes set forth therein.

(3) If a court of law rules that the three-part test in paragraph (1) cannot be applied to a particular context based on grounds other than an express exception to employment status as provided under paragraph (2), then the determination of employee or independent contractor status in that context shall instead be governed by the California Supreme Court’s decision in S. G. Borello & Sons, Inc. v. Department of Industrial Relations (1989) 48 Cal.3d 341 (Borello).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2775.5.

(a) Mere ownership of a vehicle, including a personal vehicle or a commercial vehicle, used by a person in providing labor or services for remuneration does not make that person an independent contractor. A person who owns a vehicle they use to provide labor or services, either as an individual or through a business entity they own, may be either an employee or an independent contractor depending on whether the conditions in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2775 are satisfied. If the conditions are not satisfied and the owner of the vehicle is an employee, the employee shall be reimbursed for use of the vehicle as
 described in Sections 2802 and 2802.2.

(b) This section is declarative of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 659, Sec. 2.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2776.

Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to a bona fide business-to-business contracting relationship, as defined below, under the following conditions:

(a) If an individual acting as a sole proprietor, or a business entity formed as a partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation (“business service provider”) contracts to provide services to another such business or to a public agency or quasi-public corporation (“contracting business”), the determination of employee or independent contractor status of the business services provider shall be governed by Borello, if the contracting business demonstrates that all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The business service provider is free from the control and direction of the contracting business entity in connection with the
 performance of the work, both under the contract for the performance of the work and in fact.

(2) The business service provider is providing services directly to the contracting business rather than to customers of the contracting business. This subparagraph does not apply if the business service provider’s employees are solely performing the services under the contract under the name of the business service provider and the business service provider regularly contracts with other businesses.

(3) The contract with the business service provider is in writing and specifies the payment amount, including any applicable rate of pay, for services to be performed, as well as the due date of payment for such services.

(4) If the work is performed in a jurisdiction that requires the business service provider to have a business license or business tax registration, the business service provider has the required business license or
 business tax registration.

(5) The business service provider maintains a business location, which may include the business service provider’s residence, that is separate from the business or work location of the contracting business.

(6) The business service provider is customarily engaged in an independently established business of the same nature as that involved in the work performed.

(7) The business service provider can contract with other businesses to provide the same or similar services and maintain a clientele without restrictions from the hiring entity.

(8) The business service provider advertises and holds itself out to the public as available to provide the same or similar services.

(9) Consistent with the nature of the work, the business service provider provides its own tools, vehicles, and equipment to perform the services, not including any proprietary
 materials that may be necessary to perform the services under the contract.

(10) The business service provider can negotiate its own rates.

(11) Consistent with the nature of the work, the business service provider can set its own hours and location of work.

(12) The business service provider is not performing the type of work for which a license from the Contractors’ State License Board is required, pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) When two bona fide businesses are contracting with one another under the conditions set forth in subdivision (a), the determination of whether an individual worker who is not acting as a sole proprietor or formed as a business entity, is an employee or independent contractor of the business service provider or contracting business is governed by Section 2775.

(c) This
 section does not alter or supersede any existing rights under Section 2810.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2777.

Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the relationship between a referral agency and a service provider, as defined below, under the following conditions:

(a) If an individual acting as a sole proprietor, or a business entity formed as a partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation (“service provider”) provides services to clients through a referral agency, the determination of whether the service provider is an employee or independent contractor of the referral agency shall be governed by Borello, if the referral agency demonstrates that all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The service provider is free from the control and direction of the referral agency in connection with the performance of the work for the client, both as a matter of contract and in fact.

(2) If the work for the client is performed in a jurisdiction that requires the service provider to have a business license or business tax registration in order to provide the services under the contract, the service provider shall certify to the referral agency that they have the required business license or business tax registration. The referral agency shall keep the certifications for a period of at least three years. As used in this paragraph:

(A) “Business license” includes a license, tax certificate, fee, or equivalent payment that is required or collected by a local jurisdiction annually, or on some other fixed cycle, as a condition of providing services in the local jurisdiction.

(B) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, or city and county, including charter cities.

(3) If the work for the client requires the service provider to hold a state contractor’s license pursuant to Chapter 9
 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, the service provider has the required contractor’s license.

(4) If there is an applicable professional licensure, permit, certification, or registration administered or recognized by the state available for the type of work being performed for the client, the service provider shall certify to the referral agency that they have the appropriate professional licensure, permit, certification, or registration. The referral agency shall keep the certifications for a period of at least three years.

(5) The service provider delivers services to the client under the service provider’s name, without being required to deliver the services under the name of the referral agency.

(6) The service provider provides its own tools and supplies to perform the services.

(7) The service provider is customarily engaged, or was previously
 engaged, in an independently established business or trade of the same nature as, or related to, the work performed for the client.

(8) The referral agency does not restrict the service provider from maintaining a clientele and the service provider is free to seek work elsewhere, including through a competing referral agency.

(9) The service provider sets their own hours and terms of work or negotiates their hours and terms of work directly with the client.

(10) Without deduction by the referral agency, the service provider sets their own rates, negotiates their rates with the client through the referral agency, negotiates rates directly with the client, or is free to accept or reject rates set by the client.

(11) The service provider is free to accept or reject clients and contracts, without being penalized in any form by the referral agency. This paragraph does not apply if the service provider
 accepts a client or contract and then fails to fulfill any of its contractual obligations.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Client” means:

(A) A person who utilizes a referral agency to contract for services from a service provider, or

(B) A business that utilizes a referral agency to contract for services from a service provider that are otherwise not provided on a regular basis by employees at the client’s business location, or to contract for services that are outside of the client’s usual course of business. Notwithstanding subdivision (a), it is the responsibility of a business that utilizes a referral agency to contract for services, to meet the conditions outlined in this subparagraph.

(2) (A) “Referral agency” is a business that provides clients with referrals for service providers to provide services
 under a contract, with the exception of services in subparagraph (C).

(B) Under this paragraph, referrals for services shall include, but are not limited to, graphic design, web design, photography, tutoring, consulting, youth sports coaching, caddying, wedding or event planning, services provided by wedding and event vendors, minor home repair, moving, errands, furniture assembly, animal services, dog walking, dog grooming, picture hanging, pool cleaning, yard cleanup, and interpreting services.

(C) Under this paragraph, referrals for services do not include services provided in an industry designated by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health or the Department of Industrial Relations as a high hazard industry pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 6401.7 of the Labor Code or referrals for businesses that provide janitorial, delivery, courier, transportation, trucking, agricultural labor, retail, logging,
 in-home care, or construction services other than minor home repair.

(3) (A) “Referral agency contract” is the agency’s contract with clients and service providers governing the use of its intermediary services described in paragraph (2). The intermediary services provided to the service provider by the referral agency are limited to client referrals and other administrative services ancillary to the service provider’s business operation.

(B) A referral agency’s contract may include a fee or fees to be paid by the client for utilizing the referral agency. This fee shall not be deducted from the rate set or negotiated by the service provider as set forth in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a).

(4) “Service provider” means an individual acting as a sole proprietor or business entity that agrees to the referral agency’s contract and uses the referral agency to connect with clients.

(5) “Tutor” means a person who develops and teaches their own curriculum, teaches curriculum that is proprietarily and privately developed, or provides private instruction or supplemental academic enrichment services by using their own teaching methodology or techniques. A “tutor” does not include an individual who contracts with a local education agency or private school through a referral agency for purposes of teaching students of a public or private school in a classroom setting.

(6) (A) “Youth sports coaching” means services provided by a youth sports coach who develops and implements their own curriculum, which may be subject to requirements of a youth sports league, for an athletic program in which youth who are 18 years of age or younger predominantly participate and that is organized for the purposes of training for and engaging in athletic activity and competition. “Youth sports coaching” does not mean services provided by an individual
 who contracts with a local education agency or private school through a referral agency for purposes of teaching students of a public or private school.

(7) “Interpreting services” means:

(A) Services provided by a certified or registered interpreter in a language with an available certification or registration through the Judicial Council of California, State Personnel Board, or any other agency or department in the State of California, or through a testing organization, agency, or educational institution approved or recognized by the state, or through the Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, Certification Commission for Healthcare Interpreters, National Board of Certification for Medical Interpreters, International Association of Conference Interpreters, United States Department of State, or the Administrative Office of the United States Courts.

(B) Services provided by an interpreter in a language without an available
 certification through the entities listed in subparagraph (A).

(8) “Consulting” means providing substantive insight, information, advice, opinions, or analysis that requires the exercise of discretion and independent judgment and is based on an individual’s knowledge or expertise of a particular subject matter or field of study.

(9) “Animal services” means services related to daytime and nighttime pet care including pet boarding under Section 122380 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The determination of whether an individual worker is an employee of a service provider or whether an individual worker is an employee of a client is governed by Section 2775.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2257)   Effective September 4, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2778.

(a) Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to a contract for “professional services” as defined below, and instead the determination of whether the individual is an employee or independent contractor shall be governed by Borello if the hiring entity demonstrates that all of the following factors are satisfied:

(1) The individual maintains a business location, which may include the individual’s residence, that is separate from the hiring entity. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits an individual from choosing to perform services at the location of the hiring entity.

(2) If work is performed more than six months after
 the effective date of this section and the work is performed in a jurisdiction that requires the individual to have a business license or business tax registration, the individual has the required business license or business tax registration in order to provide the services under the contract, in addition to any required professional licenses or permits for the individual to practice in their profession.

(3) The individual has the ability to set or negotiate their own rates for the services performed.

(4) Outside of project completion dates and reasonable business hours, the individual has the ability to set the individual’s own hours.

(5) The individual is customarily engaged in the same type of work performed
 under contract with another hiring entity or holds themselves out to other potential customers as available to perform the same type of work.

(6) The individual customarily and regularly exercises discretion and independent judgment in the performance of the services.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) An “individual” includes an individual providing services as a sole proprietor or other business entity.

(2) “Professional services” means services that meet any of the following:

(A) Marketing, provided that the contracted work is original and creative in character and the result of which depends
 primarily on the invention, imagination, or talent of the individual or work that is an essential part of or necessarily incident to any of the contracted work.

(B) Administrator of human resources, provided that the contracted work is predominantly intellectual and varied in character and is of such character that the output produced or the result accomplished cannot be standardized in relation to a given period of time.

(C) Travel agent services provided by either of the following:

(i) A person regulated by the Attorney General under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 17550) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(ii) An individual who is a seller of travel within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 17550.1 of the Business and Professions Code and who is exempt from the registration under subdivision (g) of Section 17550.20 of the Business and Professions Code.

(D) Graphic design.

(E) Grant writer.

(F) (i) Fine artist.

(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, “fine artist” means an individual who creates works of art to be appreciated primarily or solely for their imaginative, aesthetic, or intellectual content, including drawings, paintings, sculptures, mosaics, works of calligraphy, works of graphic art, crafts, or mixed
 media.

(G) Services provided by an enrolled agent who is licensed by the United States Department of the Treasury to practice before the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to Part 10 of Subtitle A of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(H) Payment processing agent through an independent sales organization.

(I) Services provided by any of the following:

(i) By a still photographer, photojournalist, videographer, or photo editor who works under a written contract that specifies the rate of pay and obligation to pay by a defined time, as long as the individual providing the services is not directly replacing an employee who performed the same work at the
 same volume for the hiring entity; the individual does not primarily perform the work at the hiring entity’s business location, notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a); and the individual is not restricted from working for more than one hiring entity. This subclause is not applicable to a still photographer, photojournalist, videographer, or photo editor who works on motion pictures, which is inclusive of, but is not limited to, theatrical or commercial productions, broadcast news, television, and music videos. Nothing in this section restricts a still photographer, photojournalist, photo editor, or videographer from distributing, licensing, or selling their work product to another business, except as prohibited under copyright laws or workplace collective bargaining agreements.

(ii) To a digital content aggregator by a still
 photographer, photojournalist, videographer, or photo editor.

(iii) For the purposes of this subparagraph the following definitions apply:

(I) “Photo editor” means an individual who performs services ancillary to the creation of digital content, such as retouching, editing, and keywording.

(II) “Digital content aggregator” means a licensing intermediary that obtains a license or assignment of copyright from a still
 photographer, photojournalist, videographer, or photo editor for the purposes of distributing that copyright by way of sublicense or assignment, to the intermediary’s third-party end users.

(J) Services provided by a freelance writer, translator, editor, copy editor, illustrator, or newspaper cartoonist who works under a written contract that specifies the rate of pay, intellectual property rights, and obligation to pay by a defined time, as long as the individual providing the services is not directly replacing an employee who performed the same work at the same volume for the hiring entity; the individual does not primarily perform the work at the hiring entity’s business location, notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a); and the individual is not restricted from working for more than one hiring entity.

(K) Services provided by an individual as a content contributor,
 adviser, producer, narrator, or cartographer for a journal, book, periodical, evaluation, other publication or educational, academic, or instructional work in any format or media, who works under a written contract that specifies the rate of pay, intellectual property rights, and obligation to pay by a defined time, as long as the individual providing the services is not directly replacing an employee who performed the same work at the same volume for the hiring entity, the individual does not primarily perform the work at the hiring entity’s business location notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and the individual is not restricted from working for more than one hiring entity.

(L) (i) Services provided by a licensed esthetician, licensed electrologist, licensed manicurist, licensed barber, or
 licensed cosmetologist provided that the individual:

(I) Sets their own rates, processes their own payments, and is paid directly by clients.

(II) Sets their own hours of work and has sole discretion to decide the number of clients and which clients for whom they will provide services.

(III) Has their own book of business and schedules their own appointments.

(IV) Maintains their own business license for the services offered to clients.

(V) If the individual is performing services at the location of the hiring entity, then the individual issues a Form 1099 to the salon or business owner
 from which they rent their business space.

(ii) The Employment Development Department and the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall report to the Legislature by June 1, 2026, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the annual number of allegations of misclassification or other violations of this code involving licensed manicurists since January 1, 2020, including the number of investigations undertaken, the number of workers impacted, and the number and
 outcomes of enforcement actions initiated.

(iii) This subparagraph shall become inoperative, with respect to licensed manicurists, on January 1, 2029.

(M) A specialized performer hired by a performing arts company or organization to teach a master class for no more than one week. “Master class” means a specialized course for limited duration that is not regularly offered by the hiring entity and is taught by an expert in a recognized field of artistic endeavor who does not work for the hiring entity to teach on a regular basis.

(N) Services provided by an appraiser, as defined in Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(O) Registered professional foresters licensed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 750) of Chapter 2.5 of Division 1 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the following, which are subject to the Business and Professions Code:

(1) A real estate licensee licensed by the State of California pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code, for whom the determination of employee or independent contractor status shall be governed by subdivision (b) of
 Section 10032 of the Business and Professions Code. If that section is not applicable, then this determination shall be governed as follows:

(A) For purposes of unemployment insurance by Section 650 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) For purposes of workers’ compensation by Section 3200 et seq.

(C) For all other purposes in the Labor Code by Borello. The statutorily imposed duties of a responsible broker under Section 10015.1 of the Business and Professions Code are not factors to be considered under the Borello test.

(2) A home inspector, as defined in Section 7195 of the Business and Professions Code, and subject to the provisions of Chapter 9.3 (commencing
 with Section 7195) of Division 3 of that code.

(3) A repossession agency licensed pursuant to Section 7500.2 of the Business and Professions Code, for whom the determination of employee or independent contractor status shall be governed by Section 7500.2 of the Business and Professions Code, if the repossession agency is free from the control and direction of the hiring person or entity in connection with the performance of the work, both under the contract for the performance of the work and in fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   (AB 1514)   Effective January 1, 2026.)